bg-BG: Покритие на арфата: Античен/състарен; Позлатен/златен варак; Гланц; Ръчно полиран; Лакиран; Матов; Естествен/прозрачен; Маслено покритие; Боядисан; Сатен; Байцван; С лаково покритие; Друго
zh-CN: 竖琴表面处理工艺: 仿古/做旧; 镀金/金箔; 高光; 手工抛光; 上漆; 哑光; 自然色/透明; 油性漆; 喷漆; 缎面; 染色; 清漆; 其他
cs: Harfová úprava: Starožitná/patinovaná; Pozlacená / plátkové zlato; Lesklá; Ručně leštěná; Lakovaná; Matná; Přírodní/čirá; Olejová úprava; Malovaná; Saténová; Mořená; Lakovaná; Jiné
nb: Harpefinish: Antikk / slitt; Forgylt / bladgull; Blank; Håndpolert; Lakkert; Matt; Naturlig / klar; Oljefinish; Malt; Sateng; Beiset; Lakkert; Annet
el: Φινίρισμα άρπας: Αντικέ/Παλαιωμένο; Επιχρυσωμένο/Φύλλο χρυσού; Γυαλιστερό; Φινίρισμα στο χέρι; Λακαρισμένο; Ματ; Φυσικό/Διάφανο; Φινίρισμα λαδιού; Βαμμένο; Σατινέ; Με βερνίκι εμποτισμού; Βερνικωμένο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Acabamento em harpa: Antigo/desgastado; Dourado/folha de ouro; Brilhante; Polido à mão; Envernizado; Mate; Natural/transparente; Acabamento a óleo; Pintado; Acetinado; Tingido; Envernizado; Outro
de: Finish der Harfe: Antik/Used-Look; Vergoldet/Blattgold; Glänzend; Handpoliert; Lackiert; Matt; Natur/Klar; Geölt; Bemalt; Seidenmatt; Gebeizt; Lasiert; Sonstige
lt-LT: Arfos apdaila: Antikvarinė / sendinta; Paukso / aukso folijos; Blizgi; Įtrinta rankomis; Lakuota; Matinė; Natūrali / skaidri; Aliejaus apdaila; Dažyta; Satininė; Beicuota; Lakuota; Kita
sv: Harpfinish: Antikbehandlad/sliten; Förgylld/bladguld; Blank; Handpolerad; Lackerad; Matt; Naturlig/klar; Oljad finish; Målad; Satin; Betsad; Fernissad; Övrigt
ko: 하프 마감: 앤틱/디스트레스트; 금박/골드 리프; 유광; 핸드 러브드; 래커; 무광; 내추럴/투명; 오일 마감; 페인트; 새틴; 스테인; 바니시; 기타
pl: Wykończenie harfy: Postarzany; Złocony/płatki złota; Połysk; Wcierany ręcznie; Lakierowany; Mat; Naturalny/przezroczysty; Wykończenie olejowane; Malowany; Satyna; Bejcowany; Lakierowany; Inne
sl-SI: Površinska obdelava harfe: Starinsko/obrabljeno; Pozlačeno/zlati lističi; Sijaj; Ročno polirano; Lakirano; Mat; Naravno/prozorno; Oljno; Barvano; Saten; Luženo; Premazano s firnežem; Drugo
da: Overfladefinish på harpe: Antik/slidt look; Forgyldt/bladguld; Blank; Håndpoleret; Lakeret; Mat; Naturlig/klar; Oliebehandlet; Malet; Satin; Bejdset; Ferniseret; Andet
tr: Arp yüzey kaplaması: Eskitilmiş; Yaldızlı/altın varaklı; Parlak; Elle cilalanmış; Lakeli; Mat; Doğal/şeffaf; Yağlı cila; Boyalı; Saten; Renklendirilmiş; Vernikli; Diğer
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava harfy: Starožitná/ošúchaná; Pozlátená/plátkové zlato; Lesklá; Ručne leštená; S lakovým náterom; Matná; Prírodná/priehľadná; Olejová úprava; Maľovaná; Saténová; Morená; Lakovaná; Iné
en: Harp finish: Antiqued/distressed; Gilded/gold leaf; Gloss; Hand-rubbed; Lacquered; Matte; Natural/clear; Oil finish; Painted; Satin; Stained; Varnished; Other
pt-BR: Acabamento da harpa: Envelhecido/desgastado; Dourado/folha de ouro; Brilhante; Polido à mão; Lacado; Fosco; Natural/transparente; Acabamento a óleo; Pintado; Acetinado; Tingido; Envernizado; Outro
it: Finitura dell'arpa: Anticata/invecchiata; Dorata/foglia d'oro; Lucido; Lucidata a mano; Laccata; Opaca; Naturale/trasparente; Finitura a olio; Dipinta; Satinata; Tinta; Verniciata; Altro
vi: Lớp hoàn thiện đàn hạc: Giả cổ/Làm sờn; Mạ vàng/Dát vàng; Bóng; Đánh bóng bằng tay; Sơn mài; Mờ; Tự nhiên/Trong suốt; Phủ dầu; Sơn; Satin; Nhuộm màu; Đánh vẹc-ni; Khác
es: Acabado del arpa: Envejecido/desgastado; Dorado/pan de oro; Brillo; Frotado a mano; Lacado; Mate; Natural/transparente; Acabado al aceite; Pintado; Satinado; Teñido; Barnizado; Otro
nl: Harp afwerking: Antiek/verweerd; Verguld/bladgoud; Glans; Handgewreven; Gelakt; Mat; Natuurlijk/helder; Olieafwerking; Geverfd; Satijn; Gebeitst; Gevernist; Overig
fi: Harpun viimeistely: Antiikkinen/kulutettu; Kullattu/lehtikulta; Kiiltävä; Käsinhierretty; Lakattu; Matta; Luonnollinen/kirkas; Öljyviimeistely; Maalattu; Satiini; Petsattu; Lakkapintainen; Muu
hu: Hárfa felületkezelése: Antikolt / koptatott; Aranyozott / aranyfüstös; Fényes; Kézzel dörzsölt; Lakkozott; Matt; Természetes / átlátszó; Olajos felület; Festett; Selyemfényű; Pácolt; Lakkozott; Egyéb
th: การตกแต่งพื้นผิวพิณ: แบบโบราณ/แบบเก่า; ปิดทอง/ทองคำเปลว; เคลือบเงา; ขัดด้วยมือ; เคลือบแล็กเกอร์; เคลือบด้าน; ธรรมชาติ/ใส; เคลือบน้ำมัน; ทาสี; ซาติน; ย้อมสี; เคลือบวานิช; อื่นๆ
ja: ハープ仕上げ: アンティーク/ディストレスト; 金箔; 光沢; 手磨き; ラッカー; マット; ナチュラル/クリア; オイル仕上げ; ペイント; サテン; ステイン; ニス; その他
ro-RO: Finisaj de harpă: Antichizat/uzat; Aurit/foiță de aur; Lucios; Frecat manual; Lăcuit; Mat; Natural/transparent; Finisaj cu ulei; Vopsit; Satinat; Băițuit; Dat cu vernis; Altele
zh-TW: 豎琴表面處理: 仿舊/刷舊; 鍍金/金箔; 亮面; 手工拋光; 漆面; 霧面; 自然色/透明; 油裝; 塗裝; 緞面; 染色; 清漆處理; 其他
fr: Finition de la harpe: Vieilli/usé; Doré/feuille d’or; Brillant; Poli à la main; Laqué; Mat; Naturel/transparent; Finition huilée; Peint; Satiné; Teinté; Verni; Autre
ru: Отделка арфы: Состаренная/потертая; Позолота/сусальное золото; Глянцевая; Отполированная вручную; Лакированная; Матовая; Натуральная/прозрачная; Масляная пропитка; Окрашенная; Сатиновая; Тонированная; Покрытая лаком; Другое
hr-HR: Završna obrada harfe: Starinski / rustikalni izgled; Pozlata / zlatni listići; Sjaj; Ručno polirano; Lakirano; Mat; Prirodno / prozirno; Uljna obrada; Obojano; Saten; Bajcano; Završni lak; Ostalo